Missouri, session 2026, SB1435.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 286.010, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 286.010,
to read as follows:
286.010. There is hereby created and established a
separate department of the state government to be known as
"The Department of Labor and Industrial Relations". Such
department shall be under the control, management and
supervision of a commission to be known and designated as
"The Labor and Industrial Relations Commission of
Missouri". Such commission shall consist of [three] five
members, each of whom shall have resided in this state for
at least five years immediately prior to the person's
appointment, to be appointed by the governor, by and with
the advice and consent of the senate. One member of the
commission shall be a person who, on account of the person's
previous vocation, employment, affiliation or interests
shall be classified as a representative of employers, and
one member who, on account of the person's previous
vocation, employment, affiliation or interests shall be
classified as a representative of employees, and one member,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1435 2
who, by reason of the person's previous activities and
interests shall be classified as a representative of the
public and who is licensed to practice law in the state of
Missouri; provided, however, that not more than [two] three
members of the commission shall be of the same political
party. A member of the commission shall be designated by
the governor as the chairman of the commission. During the
member's term of membership on the commission, no member
shall engage in any other business, vocation or employment,
or serve as an officer or committee member of any political
party or organization. Any [two] three commissioners shall
constitute a quorum. The governor shall fill any vacancy
within sixty days but no vacancy shall impair the right of
the remaining commissioners to exercise all powers of the
commission.
✓